North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 2. Local Administration.
§ 130A-52.
Special election if election not held in November of 1981.

If in a sanitary district, an election of board members was required to be held in November of 1981 under

G.S. 130A-50

but was not held, the board of commissioners of the county or counties in which the district is located may by resolution order a special election of all the board members to be held at the same time as the General
Election in November of 1982.

The election shall be held under the procedures of Articles 23 and 24 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes and in accordance with

G.S. 130A-50

, except that filing shall open at noon on Monday, August 9, 1982, and close at noon on Monday, August 23, 1982.

In the election held under this section, all of the members of the board shall be elected. If the board of commissioners has provided for two- or four-year terms, the members elected in 1982 shall serve until the 1983 or 1985 election, respectively, and
then their successors shall be elected for the two-or four-year terms provided by the county board or boards of commissioners.

Any resolution adopted under subsection (a) of this section shall be filed with the Department.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1271, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Article 27 of Chapter 163A” for “Articles 23 and 24 of Chapter
163” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (b).

§ 130A-52.1.
Action if 1983 election not held.

If any sanitary district held an election in 1982 under

G.S. 130A-52

, but failed to hold the 1983 election, then the persons elected in 1982 shall hold office until the terms that were to begin in 1983 have expired.

History.
1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1021, s. 1.

§ 130A-53.
Actions validated.

Any action of a sanitary district taken prior to July 1, 1984, shall not be invalidated by failure to hold an election for members of the board.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1271, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1021, s. 2.

§ 130A-54.
Vacancy appointments to district boards.

Any vacancy in a sanitary district board shall be filled by the county commissioners until the next election for sanitary district board members. If the district is located in more than one county, the vacancy shall be filled by the county commissioners
of the county from which the vacancy occurred.

History.
1935, c. 357, s. 2; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1981, c. 186, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-55.
Corporate powers.

A sanitary district board shall be a body politic and corporate and may sue and be sued in matters relating to the sanitary district. Notwithstanding any limitation in the petition under

G.S. 130A-48

, but subject to the provisions of G.S. 130A-55(17)e, each sanitary district may exercise all of the powers granted to sanitary districts by this Article. In addition, the sanitary district board shall have the following
powers:

To acquire, construct, maintain and operate sewage collection, treatment and disposal systems of all types, including septic tank systems or other on-site collection, treatment or disposal facilities or systems; water supply systems; water purification
or treatment plants and other utilities necessary for the preservation and promotion of the public health and sanitary welfare within the district. The utilities shall be constructed, operated and maintained in accordance with
applicable statutes and rules.

To acquire, construct, maintain and operate sewage collection, treatment and disposal systems of all types, including septic tank systems or other on-site collection or disposal facilities or systems, water supply systems; water purification or treatment
plants and other utilities, within and outside the corporate limits of the district, as may be necessary for the preservation of the public health and sanitary welfare outside the corporate limits of the district, within reasonable
limitation. The utilities shall be constructed, operated and maintained in accordance with applicable statutes and rules.

The authority granted to a sanitary district by the provisions of this subsection is supplemental to the authority granted to a sanitary district by other provisions of law.

Actions taken by a sanitary district to acquire, construct, maintain and operate sewage collection, treatment and disposal systems of all types; water supply systems; water purification or treatment plants and other utilities within and outside the corporate
limits to provide service outside the corporate limits are approved and validated.

This subsection shall apply only in counties with a population of 70,000 or greater, as determined by the most recent decennial federal census.

To levy taxes on property within the district in order to carry out the powers and duties conferred and imposed on the district by law, and to pay the principal of and interest on bonds and notes of the district.

To acquire either by purchase, condemnation or otherwise and hold real and personal property, easements, rights-of-way and water rights in the name of the district within or without the corporate limits of the district, necessary or convenient for the
construction or maintenance of the works of the district.

To employ and compensate engineers, counsel and other persons as may be necessary to carry out projects.

To negotiate and enter into agreements with the owners of existing water supplies, sewage systems or other utilities as may be necessary to carry out the intent of this Part.

To adopt rules necessary for the proper functioning of the district. However, these rules shall not conflict with rules adopted by the Commission for Public Health, Environmental Management Commission, or the local board of health having jurisdiction
over the area. Further, such sanitary district board rules shall be no more restrictive than or conflict with requirements or ordinances of any county having jurisdiction over the area, and, if a conflict should arise, the requirements
or ordinances of the county having jurisdiction over the area shall control.

To contract with any person within or outside the corporate limits of the district to supply raw water without charge to the person in return for an agreement to allow the district to discharge sewage in the person’s previous water supply. The district
may so contract and construct at its expense all improvements necessary or convenient for the delivery of the water when, in the opinion of the sanitary district board and the Department, it will be for the best of the
district.

To contract with any person within or outside the corporate limits of the district to supply raw or filtered water and sewer service to the person where the service is available. For service supplied outside the corporate limits of the district, the sanitary
district board may fix a different rate from that charged within the corporate limits but shall not be liable for damages for failure to furnish a sufficient supply of water and adequate sewer service.

To contract with any person within or outside the corporate limits of the district for the treatment of the district’s sewage in a sewage disposal or treatment plant owned and constructed or to be constructed by that person.

After adoption of a plan as provided in

G.S. 130A-60

, the sanitary district board may, in its discretion, alter or modify the plan if the Department determines that the alteration or modification does not constitute a material deviation from the objective of the plan
and is in the public health interest of the district. The alteration or modification must be approved by the Department. The sanitary district board may appropriate or reappropriate money of the district for carrying out the altered
or modified plan.

To take action, subject to the approval of the Department, for the prevention and eradication of diseases transmissible by vectors by instituting programs for the eradication of the mosquito.

To collect and dispose of garbage, waste and other refuse by contract or otherwise.

To establish a fire department, or to contract for firefighting apparatus and personnel for the protection of life and property within the district.

To provide or contract for rescue service, ambulance service, rescue squad or other emergency medical services for use in the district. The sanitary district shall be subject to

G.S. 153A-250

.

To have privileges and immunities granted to other governmental units in exercise of the governmental functions.

To use the income of the district, and if necessary, to levy and collect taxes upon all the taxable property within the district sufficient to pay the costs of collecting and disposing of garbage, waste and other refuse, to provide fire protection and
rescue services in the district, and to acquire, construct, maintain, operate, and regulate roads and streets within the district. Taxes shall be levied and collected at the same time and in the same manner as taxes for debt service
as provided in

G.S. 130A-62

.

To adopt rules for the promotion and protection of the public health and for these purposes to possess the following powers:

To require the owners of developed property on which there are situated one or more residential dwelling units or commercial establishments located within the jurisdiction of the district and within a reasonable distance of any waterline or sewer collection
line owned, leased as lessee, or operated by the district to connect the property with the waterline, sewer connection line, or both and fix charges for the connections. The power granted by this subdivision may be exercised
by a district only to the extent that the service, whether water, sewer, or a combination thereof, to be provided by the district is not then being provided to the improved property by any other political subdivision or
by a public utility regulated by the North Carolina Utilities Commission pursuant to Chapter 62 of the General Statutes. In the case of improved property that would qualify for the issuance of a building permit for the
construction of one or more residential dwelling units or commercial establishments and where the district has installed water or sewer lines or a combination thereof directly available to the property, the district may
require payment of a periodic availability charge, not to exceed the minimum periodic service charge for properties that are connected. In accordance with

G.S. 87-97.1

, when developed property is located so as to be served by a sanitary district water line and the property owner has connected to that water line, the property owner may continue to use any private water
well located on the property for nonpotable purposes as long as the water well is not interconnected to the sanitary district water line and the sanitary district shall not require the owner of any such water well to abandon,
cap, or otherwise compromise the integrity of the water well.

To require any person owning, occupying or controlling improved real property within the district where the water or sewage systems of the district are not immediately available or it is impractical with the systems, to install sanitary toilets, septic
tanks and other health equipment or installations in accordance with applicable statutes and rules.

To order a person to abate a public health nuisance of the district. If the person being ordered to abate the nuisance refuses to comply with the order, the sanitary district board may institute an action in the superior court of the county where the
public health nuisance exists to enforce the order.

To abolish or regulate and control the use and occupancy of all pigsties and other animal stockyards or pens within the district and for an additional distance of 500 feet beyond the outer boundaries of the district, unless the 500 feet is within the
corporate limits of a city or town.

Upon the noncompliance by a person of a rule adopted by the sanitary district board, the board shall notify the person of the rule being violated and the facts constituting the violation. The person shall have a reasonable time to comply with the rule
as determined by the local health director of the person’s residence. Upon failure to comply within the specified time or within a time extended by the sanitary district board, the person shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

The sanitary district board is authorized to enforce the rules adopted pursuant to this Part by criminal action or civil action, including injunctive relief.

For the purpose of promoting and protecting the public health, safety and the general welfare of the State, a sanitary district board is authorized to establish as zoning units any portions of the sanitary district not under the control of the United
States or this State or any agency or instrumentality of either, in accordance with the following:

No sanitary district board shall designate an area a zoning area until a petition signed by two-thirds of the qualified voters in the area, as shown by the registration books used in the last general election, and with a petition signed by two-thirds
of the owners of real property in the area, as shown by the records in the office of the register of deeds for the county, is filed with the sanitary district board. The petition must be accompanied by a map of the proposed
zoning area. The board shall hold a public hearing to obtain comment on the proposed creation of the zoning area. A notice of public hearing must be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least
two times, and a copy of the notice shall be posted at the county courthouse and in three other public places in the sanitary district.

When a zoning area is established within a sanitary district, the sanitary district board as to the zoning area shall have all rights, privileges, powers and duties granted to local governments under Article 7 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes.
However, the sanitary district board shall not be required to appoint any zoning commission or board of adjustment. If neither a zoning commission nor board of adjustment is appointed, the sanitary district board shall
have all rights.

A sanitary district board may enter into an agreement with any city, town or sanitary district for the establishment of a joint zoning commission.

A sanitary district board is authorized to use the income of the district and levy and collect taxes upon the taxable property within the district necessary to carry out and enforce the rules and provisions of this subsection.

This subsection shall apply only to sanitary districts which adjoin and are contiguous to an incorporated city or town and are located within three miles or less of the boundaries of two other cities or towns.

To negotiate for and acquire by contract any distribution system located outside the district when the water for the distribution system is furnished by the district. If the distribution system is acquired by a district, the district may continue the
operation of the system even though it remains outside the district.

To accept gifts of real and personal property for the purpose of operating a nonprofit cemetery; to own, operate and maintain cemeteries with the donated property; and to establish perpetual care funds for the cemeteries in the manner provided by

G.S. 160A-347

.

To dispose of real or personal property belonging to the district according to the procedures prescribed in Article 12 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes. For purposes of this subsection, references in Article 12 of Chapter 160A to the “city,” the
“council,” or a specific city official refer, respectively, to the sanitary district, the sanitary district board, and the sanitary district official who most nearly performs the same duties performed by the specified city official.
For purposes of this subsection, references in G.S. 160A-266(c) to “one or more city officials” are deemed to refer to one or more sanitary district officials designated by the sanitary district board.

To acquire, renovate property for or construct a medical clinic to serve the district, and to maintain real and personal property for a medical clinic to serve the district.

To make special assessments against benefitted property within the corporate limits of the sanitary district and within the area served or to be served by the sanitary district for the purpose of constructing, reconstructing, extending, or otherwise improving
water systems or sanitary collection, treatment, and sewage disposal systems, in the same manner that a county may make special assessments under authority of Article 9 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes, except that the language
appearing in

G.S. 153A-185

reading as follows: “A county may not assess property within a city pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of this section unless the governing board of the city has by resolution approved the project,” shall not apply
to assessments levied by sanitary districts. For the purposes of this paragraph, references in Article 9 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes, to the “county,” the “board of county commissioners,” “the board” or a specific county
official or employee are deemed to refer respectively to the sanitary district and to the official or employee of the sanitary district who performs most nearly the same duties performed by the specified county official or employee.Assessment
rolls after being confirmed shall be filed for registration in the office of the Register of Deeds of the county in which the property being assessed is located, and the term “county tax collector” wherever used in

G.S. 153A-195

and

G.S. 153A-196

, shall mean the officer designated by the sanitary district to perform the functions described in said sections of the statute. This subdivision applies only to sanitary districts with a population of 15,000 or
over.

To acquire (by purchase, lease, gift, or otherwise, but not by condemnation), construct, maintain, operate, and regulate roads and streets within the sanitary district which are not State-maintained. Not all of these powers need be exercised.

Expired.

To negotiate and enter into agreements with other municipal corporations or sanitary districts for the purpose of developing and implementing an economic development plan. The agreement may provide for the establishment of a special fund, in which monies
not expended at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund. The lead agency designated under the agreement shall be responsible for examination of the fund and compliance with sound accounting principles, including the annual
independent audit under

G.S. 159-34

. The audit responsibilities of the other municipal corporations and sanitary districts extend only to the verification of the contribution to the fund created under the agreement. The procedural requirements of

G.S. 158-7.1(c)

shall apply to actions of a sanitary district under this subdivision as if it were a city.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 7; 1933, c. 8, ss. 1, 2; 1935, c. 287, ss. 1, 2; 1941, c. 116; 1945, c. 651, ss. 1, 2; 1947, c. 476; 1949, c. 880, s. 1; cc. 1130, 1145; 1951, c. 17, s. 1; c. 1035, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1961, cc. 669,
865, 1155; 1963, c. 1232; 1965, c. 496, s. 1; 1967, c. 632; c. 637, s. 1; c. 798, s. 2; 1969, cc. 478, 700, 944; 1971, c. 780, s. 29; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1979, c. 520, s. 2; c. 619, s. 7; 1981, cc. 629, 655; c. 820, ss. 1-3; c. 898,
ss. 1-4; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1237; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; c. 925, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 948; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 422, ss. 1-4; 2001-221, s. 1; 2006-214, s. 1; 2007-182, s. 2; 2011-256, s. 2; 2011-394, s.
22; 2015-246, s. 3.5(g); 2019-111, s. 2.5(j); 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

Columbus: 1993, c. 266, s. 1 (Riegelwood Sanitary District therein).

Local Modification.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-128 and Former Similar Provisions.

Caswell: 1939, c. 3; 1941, c. 89; 1943, c. 287; 1945, c. 20; Dare (and municipalities and sanitary districts therein): 1959, c. 1079; Moore: 1939, c. 3; Rockingham: 1947, cc. 565, 849.

Cross References.

As to counties in which the consent of the board of commissioners is required before land may be condemned or acquired by a local governmental unit outside the county, see

G.S. 153A-15

.

§ 130A-55.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-443, s. 11A.2.

§ 130A-56.
Election of officers; board compensation.

Upon election, a sanitary district board shall meet and elect one of its members as chairperson and another member as secretary.

The board may employ a clerk or other assistants as necessary and may fix duties of and compensation for employees. A sanitary district board may remove employees and fill vacancies.

The board may fix the compensation and allowances of the chairman and other members of the board by adoption of the annual budget ordinance, payable from the funds of the district, but no increase may become effective earlier than the first meeting of
the board following the next election of board members after adoption of the ordinance. Until adoption of an ordinance under this subsection, each member of the board may receive compensation as provided for members of State boards
under

G.S. 138-5

, payable from funds of the district.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 8; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1967, c. 723; 1977, c. 183; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 29, ss. 1, 2; 1995, c. 422, s. 5; 2003-185, s. 1.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-129.

Halifax: 1961, c. 883; 1969, c. 345.

§ 130A-57.
Power to condemn property.

A sanitary district board may purchase real estate, right-of-way or easement within or outside the corporate limits of the district for improvements authorized by this Part. If a purchase price cannot be agreed upon, the board may condemn the real estate,
right-of-way or easement in accordance with Chapter 40A of the General Statutes.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 9; 1933, c. 8, s. 3; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1981, c. 919, s. 13; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-130.

Ashe: 1981, c. 283; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1150; Bladen: 1981, c. 134; Brunswick: 1981, c. 283; (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1150; Caswell: 1981, c. 941; Columbus: 1981, c. 270; Franklin and Grandville: 1981, c. 941; Johnston: 1981, c. 459; Pender: 1981,
c. 283; Person: 1981, c. 941; Sampson: 1981, c. 459; Vance and Warren: 1981, c. 941.

Cross References.

As to counties in which the consent of the board of commissioners is required before land may be condemned or acquired by a local governmental unit outside the county, see

G.S. 153A-15

.

§ 130A-58.
Construction of systems by corporations or individuals.

When it is inadvisable or impractical for the sanitary district to build a water supply, sewage system or part of either to serve an area within the sanitary district, a corporation or residents within the sanitary district may build and operate a system
at its or their own expense. The system shall be constructed and operated under plans and specifications approved by the district board and by the Department. The system shall also be constructed and operated in accordance with applicable
rules and statutes.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 10; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-59.
Reports.

Upon the election of a sanitary district board, the board shall employ engineers licensed by this State to make a report on the problems of the sanitary district. The report shall be prepared and filed with the sanitary district board and shall include
the following:

Comprehensive maps showing the boundaries of the sanitary district and, in a general way, the location of the various parts of the work that is proposed to be done and information as may be useful for a thorough understanding of the proposed undertaking;

A general description of existing facilities for carrying out the purposes of the district;

A general description of the various plans which might be adopted for accomplishment of the purposes of the district;

General plans and specifications for the work;

General description of property proposed to be acquired or which may be damaged in carrying out the work;

Comparative detail estimates of cost for the various construction plans; and

Recommendations.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 11; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-60.
Consideration of reports and adoption of a plan.

A report filed by the engineers pursuant to

G.S. 130A-59

shall be given consideration by the sanitary district board and the board shall adopt a plan. Before adopting a plan the board may hold a public hearing for the purpose of considering objections to the plan. Once
adopted, the sanitary district board shall submit the plan to the Department. The plan shall not become effective until it is approved by the Department.

The provisions of this section and of

G.S. 130A-58

shall apply when the sanitary district board determines that adoption of the plan requires the issuance of bonds. However, these provisions shall not apply to a proposed purchase of firefighting equipment and apparatus.
Failure to observe or comply with these provisions shall not, however, affect the validity of the bonds of a sanitary district.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 12; 1949, c. 880, s. 1; 1951, c. 17, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-61.
Bonds and notes authorized.

A sanitary district is authorized to issue bonds and notes under the Local Government Finance Act.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 13; 1949, c. 880, s. 1; 1951, c. 17, s. 1; c. 846, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 1247, s. 1; 1971, c. 780, s. 27; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-62.
Annual budget; tax levy.

A sanitary district shall operate under an annual balanced budget adopted in accordance with the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act.

A sanitary district has the option of either collecting its own taxes or having its taxes collected by the county or counties in which it is located. Unless a district takes affirmative action to collect its own taxes, taxes shall be collected by the
county.

For sanitary districts whose taxes are collected by the county, before May 1 of each year, the assessor of each county in which the district is located shall certify to the district board the total assessed value of property in the county subject to taxation
by the district. By July 1 or upon adoption of its annual budget ordinance, the district board shall certify to the county board of commissioners the rate of ad valorem tax levied by the district on property in that county. Upon
receiving the district’s certification of its tax levy, the county commissioners shall compute the district tax for each taxpayer and shall separately state the district tax on the county tax receipts for the fiscal year. The county
shall collect the district tax in the same manner that county taxes are collected and shall remit these collections to the district at least monthly. Partial payments shall be proportionately divided between the county and the
district. The district budget ordinance may include an appropriation to the county for the cost to the county of computing, billing, and collecting the district tax. The amount of the appropriation shall be agreed upon by the county
and the district, but may not exceed five percent (5%) of the district levy. Any agreement shall remain effective until modified by mutual agreement. The amount due the county for collecting the district tax may be deducted by
the county from its monthly remittances to the district or may be paid to the county by the district.

Sanitary districts electing to collect their own taxes shall be deemed cities for the purposes of the Machinery Act, Subchapter II of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 17; 1935, c. 287, ss. 3, 4; 1949, c. 880, s. 1; 1951, c. 17, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 994; 1963, c. 1226; 1965, c. 496, s. 3; 1971, c. 780, s. 29; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 45, s. 1; 1991 (Reg.
Sess., 1992), c. 1007, s. 38.

§ 130A-63.
Engineers to provide plans and supervise work; bids.

The sanitary district board shall retain engineers licensed by this State to provide detailed plans and specifications and to supervise the work undertaken by the district. The work or any portion of the work may be done by the sanitary district board
by purchasing the material and letting a contract for the work or by letting a contract for furnishing all the materials and doing the work.

All contracts for work performed for construction or repair and for the purchase of materials by sanitary districts shall be in accordance with the provisions of Article 8, Chapter 143 of the General Statutes which are applicable to counties and municipal
corporations.

All work done shall be in accordance with the plans and specifications prepared by the engineers in conformity with the plan adopted by the sanitary district board.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 19; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1977, c. 544, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-143.

Bessemer Sanitary District: 1953, c. 729, s. 3.

§ 130A-64.
Service charges and rates.

A sanitary district board shall apply service charges and rates based upon the exact benefits derived. These service charges and rates shall be sufficient to provide funds for the maintenance, adequate depreciation and operation of the work of the district.
If reasonable, the service charges and rates may include an amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest maturing on the outstanding bonds and, to the extent not otherwise provided for, bond anticipation notes of the district.
Any surplus from operating revenues shall be set aside as a separate fund to be applied to the payment of interest on or to the retirement of bonds or bond anticipation notes. The sanitary district board may modify and adjust these
service charges and rates.

The district board may require system development fees only in accordance with Article 8 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 20; 1933, c. 8, s. 5; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1965, c. 496, s. 4; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2017-138, s. 2.

§ 130A-64.1.
Notice of new or increased charges and rates; public comment period.

A sanitary district shall provide notice to interested parties of the imposition of or increase in service charges or rates applicable solely to the construction of development subject to Part 2 of Article 19 of Chapter 160A or Part 2 of Article 18 of
Chapter 153A of the General Statutes for any service provided by the sanitary district at least seven days prior to the first meeting where the imposition of or increase in the charges or rates is on the agenda for consideration.
The sanitary district shall employ at least two of the following means of communication in order to provide the notice required by this section:

Notice of the meeting in a prominent location on a Web site managed or maintained by the sanitary district.

Notice of the meeting in a prominent physical location, including, but not limited to, the district’s headquarters or any government building, library, or courthouse located within the sanitary district.

Notice of the meeting by electronic mail to a list of interested parties that is created by the sanitary district for the purpose of notification as required by this section.

Notice of the meeting by facsimile to a list of interested parties that is created by the sanitary district for the purpose of notification as required by this section.

(a1)
If a sanitary district does not maintain its own Web site, it may employ the notice option provided by subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section by submitting a request to a county or counties
in which the district is located to post such notice in a prominent location on a Web site that is maintained by the county or counties. Any sanitary district that elects to provide such notice shall make its request
to the county or counties at least 15 days prior to the date of the first meeting where the imposition of or increase in the fees or charges is on the agenda for consideration.

During the consideration of the imposition of or increase in service charges or rates as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the governing body of the sanitary district shall permit a period of public comment.

This section shall not apply if the imposition of or increase in service charges or rates is contained in a budget filed in accordance with the requirements of

G.S. 159-12

.

History.
2009-436, s. 3; 2010-180, s. 11(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-180, s. 11(c), effective February 1, 2011, deleted “Electronic” from the beginning of the section catchline; in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “A sanitary district shall provide notice
to interested parties of the imposition” for “If a sanitary district has a Web site maintained by one or more of its employees, the sanitary district shall provide notice of the imposition,” inserted “of the General Statutes,” and
deleted “on the sanitary district’s Web site” following “by the sanitary district,” and added the last sentence; added subdivisions (a)(1) through (a)(4); and added subsection (a1).

§ 130A-65.
Liens for sewer service charges in sanitary districts not operating water distribution system; collection of charges; disconnection of sewer lines.

In sanitary districts which maintain and operate a sewage system but do not maintain and operate a water distribution system, the charges made for sewer service or for use of sewer service facilities shall be a lien upon the property served. If the charges
are not paid within 15 days after they become due and payable, suit may be brought in the name of the sanitary district in the county in which the property served is located, or the property, subject to the lien, may be sold by the
sanitary district under the same rules, rights of redemption and savings as are prescribed by law for the sale of land for unpaid ad valorem taxes. A sanitary district is authorized to adopt rules for the use of sewage works and the
collection of charges. A sanitary district is authorized in accordance with its rules to enter upon the premises of any person using the sewage works and failing to pay the charges, and to disconnect the sewer line of that person from
the district sewer line or disposal plant. A person who connects or reconnects with district sewer line or disposal plant without a permit from the sanitary district shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.
1965, c. 920, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 949; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-144.1.

Burke, Chowan, Forsyth, Gaston and Onslow: 1965, c. 920, s. 11/2.

§ 130A-66.
Removal of member of board.

A petition with the signatures of twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the voters within a sanitary district which requests the removal from office of one or more members of a sanitary district board for malfeasance or nonfeasance in office may be filed
with the board of commissioners of the county in which all or the greater portion of the voters of a sanitary district are located. Upon receipt of the petition, the county board of commissioners shall meet and adopt a resolution to
hold an election on the question of removal. In the event that more than one member of a sanitary district board is subjected to recall in an election, the names of each member of the board subjected to recall shall appear upon separate
ballots. If in a recall election, a majority of the votes within the sanitary district are cast for the removal of a member or members of the sanitary district board subject to recall, the member or members shall cease to be a member
or members of the sanitary district board. A vacancy shall be immediately filled. The expenses of holding a recall election shall be paid from the funds of the sanitary district.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 21; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1981, c. 186, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-67.
Rights-of-way granted.

A right-of-way in, along or across a county or State highway, street or property within a sanitary district is granted to a sanitary district in case the board finds it necessary or convenient for carrying out the work of the district. Any work done in,
along or across a State highway shall be done in accordance with the rules of the Board of Transportation.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 22; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-68.
Returns of elections.

In all elections provided for in this Part, the board of elections shall file copies of the returns with the county boards of commissioners, sanitary district board and clerk of superior court in which the district is located.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 23; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1981, c. 186, s. 4; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.